District of Columbia statutes.
38-1271.03

Funding for transition plan.

Funding to support the development of the transition plan for an independent community college shall consist of $500,000, as set forth in the fiscal year 2012 budget and financial plan, to be transferred to an account held by the UDC Trustees and to be exclusively used for the purpose of developing the transition plan as described in this chapter.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 4704, 58 DCR 6226